Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 35. new text end new text begin Rescinding of benefits prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must not rescind any public assistance benefits distributed by the department of any person due to that person's vaccination status. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not rescind any public assistance benefits distributed by the department of any person, parent, caregiver, guardian, legal custodian, or head of household due to the vaccination status of a person under their care. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 44. new text end new text begin Rescinding of benefits prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must not rescind any public assistance benefits distributed by the department of any person due to that person's vaccination status. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not rescind any public assistance benefits distributed by the department of any person, parent, caregiver, guardian, legal custodian, or head of household due to the vaccination status of a person under their care. new text end